Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.090

Donated moneys.

A public stadium authority may accept and expend moneys that may be donated for the purpose of a stadium and exhibition center.

[ 1997 c 220 s 108 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]